Connecticut, session 2026, SB00034.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That subdivision (9) of section 10-262f of the general statutes be
amended to redefine "foundation" by increasing the amount of the
foundation from eleven thousand five hundred twenty-five dollars to
sixteen thousand sixty-five dollars.